Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1501
Register of deeds; office, equipment, and supplies; residency.

In each county that has a register of deeds, the county board shall provide suitable office room, fireproof vaults of sufficient capacity, and necessary books, blanks, stationery, and office furniture for the use of the register of deeds.

A register of deeds elected after November 1986 need not be a resident of the county when he or she files for election as register of deeds, but a register of deeds shall reside in a county for which he or she holds office.

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 2, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 5616;

C.S.1922, § 4943;

C.S.1929, § 26-1201;

R.S.1943, § 23-1501;

Laws 1986, LB 812, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 24, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 32.